Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-933.07
Purchase of service credit or repurchase of relinquished creditable service; rules and regulations.

The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the purchase of service credit or the repurchase of relinquished creditable service, which shall include, but not be limited to, the method for determining actuarial cost and interest requirements for payments other than one lump-sum payment.

Laws 1996, LB 1076, § 26;

Laws 2014, LB1042, § 5;

Laws 2018, LB1005, § 30.